Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 11. Tax and Revenue Anticipation Notes

§ 9-4-1101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Revenues” means any income or other receipts duly credited to any fund of the state during any fiscal year from any source, including but not limited to income and receipts from taxes, distributions or grants from any other public entity or the federal government and income or receipts from investment of those funds, but excluding the proceeds of any borrowing;

“This act” means

9-4-1101

through

9-4-1105

.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 114, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-4-1102.
Authority.

The state treasurer may, with the approval of the governor and the attorney general, issue tax and revenue anticipation notes and interest coupons pertaining to those notes when he determines that as part of the state’s investment management program it is prudent to do so to avoid liquidation of investments on terms unfavorable to the state to meet short term cash requirements.

The principal amount of notes issued and outstanding at any time under subsection (a) of this section shall be limited to three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000.00) but not to exceed the amount of revenue anticipated to be received during the applicable fiscal year and pledged for the repayment of the notes.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 114, § 1; 1998, ch. 68, § 1; 2000, ch. 12, § 1.

§ 9-4-1103.
Payment from anticipated revenues; notes do not constitute indebtedness.

Tax and revenue anticipation notes issued under W.S.

9-4-1102

shall be payable solely from those revenues anticipated to be but not yet received and credited to the specified funds or accounts for the fiscal year in which the notes are issued. Each issue of tax and revenue anticipation notes and interest coupons pertaining to those notes, if any, shall mature in the fiscal year issued. The owners or holders of the notes shall not look to any other source for payment of the principal of or any premium or interest on the notes.

Tax and revenue anticipation notes issued under W.S.

9-4-1102

do not constitute an indebtedness or debt within the meaning of the Wyoming constitution, article 16.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 114, § 1.

§ 9-4-1104.
Terms and conditions of issuance.

Tax and revenue anticipation notes:

Shall be issued in a form consistent with the provisions of this act;

Shall describe the fund or account and the revenue from which the notes are payable;

Shall bear interest at a rate or rates determined by the state treasurer to be for the best advantage of the state and which shall be set forth in the note; and

May be redeemable or payable prior to maturity at a time and upon payment of premiums, if any, determined by the state treasurer to be for the best advantage of the state and which shall be set forth in the note.

In connection with the issuance of any notes, the state treasurer may create accounts within any fund as necessary or convenient for the segregation of note proceeds and investment income from the notes. In connection with the issuance of any notes, the state treasurer may make customary covenants on behalf of the state as necessary to secure the notes. Tax and revenue anticipation notes issued under W.S.

9-4-1102

and interest coupons pertaining to these notes shall be executed by the manual or facsimile signature of the state treasurer. The notes shall set forth provisions made under this subsection for the note’s security.

When there is an issuance of tax and revenue anticipation notes under W.S.

9-4-1102

, the state treasurer shall determine and specify:

The denomination of each issuance;

The date of issuance;

The date of maturity which shall be on or before the last day of the fiscal year;

Maturity amounts;

The interest rate;

The form and execution of the notes;

Payment of notes;

Terms of redemption with or without premium;

Terms of sale including whether the sale will be public or private;

Such other terms and conditions as the state treasurer deems necessary or desirable.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 114, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “or account” in (a)(ii).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-4-1101(a)(ii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-4-1105.
Investment of proceeds; investment earnings.

The state treasurer may invest the proceeds of tax and revenue anticipation notes in any securities or investments authorized by law for funds of the state until necessary to meet the short term cash requirements under W.S. 9-4-1102(a).

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, income from any investment under subsection (a) of this section shall be credited to the fund or account from which the notes are payable.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 114, § 1.